Washington statutes.
RCW 36.74.010

Assumption of rights, powers, functions, and obligations authorized.

Any city or county in which a transportation benefit district has been established pursuant to chapter 36.73 RCW with boundaries coterminous with the boundaries of the city or county may by ordinance or resolution of the city or county legislative authority assume the rights, powers, functions, and obligations of the transportation benefit district in accordance with this chapter.

[ 2015 3rd sp.s. c 44 s 301.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2015 3rd sp.s. c 44: See note following RCW 46.68.395.